Utah statutes.
58-56-17.5.   Factory Built Housing Fees Restricted Account.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
"Factory Built Housing Fees Account."
(2) (a)  The restricted account shall be funded from the fees the dealer
collects and remits to the division for each factory built home the dealer
sells as provided in Subsection 58-56-17(1).
(b)  The division shall deposit all money collected under Subsection
58-56-17(1) in the restricted account.
(c)  The restricted account shall be used to pay for education and enforcement
of this chapter, including investigations and administrative actions and the
funding of additional employees to the amount of the legislative
appropriation.
(d)  The restricted account may accrue interest which shall be deposited into
the restricted account.
